Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska11-109
Bonds; county and precinct officers; sureties; number; qualification.

All official bonds of county, precinct and other local officers shall be executed by the principal named in such bonds and by at least two sufficient sureties who shall be freeholders of the county in which such bonds are given; or any official bond of a county, precinct or local officer may be executed by the officer as principal and by a guaranty, surety, fidelity or bonding company as surety, or by two or more of such companies. Only such companies as are legally authorized to transact business in this state shall be eligible to suretyship on the bond of a county, precinct or other local officer.

Laws 1881, c. 13, § 9, p. 96;

Laws 195, c. 10, § 1, p. 63;

R.S.1913, § 5715;

C.S.1922, § 5045;

C.S.1929, § 12-109;

R.S.1943, § 11-109.

Principal is required to execute bond. Foote v. County of Adams, 163 Neb. 406, 80 N.W.2d 179 (1956).

Expense of county treasurer's bond, when legally executed, with qualified bonding company as surety, and approved is a binding obligation of county. Haase v. Buffalo County, 86 Neb. 145, 124 N.W. 1130 (1910).